Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202668-1512
Support; maximum allowance; limitations; appropriations; legislative intent.

(1) The maximum support allowable under sections 68-1501 to 68-1519 shall be (a) four hundred dollars per month per disabled person averaged over any one-year period or (b) four hundred dollars per month per family averaged over any one-year period for the first disabled family member plus two hundred dollars per month averaged over any one-year period for each additional disabled family member. The department shall not provide support, pursuant to sections 68-1501 to 68-1519, to any family or disabled person whose gross income less the cost of medical or other care specifically related to the disability exceeds the median family income for a family of four in Nebraska, except that the department shall make adjustments for the actual size of the family.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that any appropriation relating to this section be increased accordingly so that each person who received support prior to September 2, 2023, will continue to receive support.

Laws 1981, LB 389, § 12;

Laws 1985, LB 87, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB227, § 67.